Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska82-323
Nebraska Arts Council; artists; how chosen.

The Nebraska Arts Council shall give a preference to regional artists in its selection of and commissioning of artists for projects under sections 82-317 to 82-329, 85-106 to 85-106.03, and 85-304 to 85-304.03.

Laws 1978, LB 664, § 7.